Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska89-197
Unlawful acts.

It shall be unlawful for any person to:

(1) Use in commerce any weighing and measuring device which is not correct;

(2) Remove any tag, seal, or mark of a stop-use, stop-sale, hold, or removal order issued by the department from any weighing and measuring device or commodity without specific written authorization from the department;

(3) Fail to report to the department when any tag, seal, or mark of a stop-use, stop-sale, hold, or removal order issued by the department has been removed from any weighing and measuring device or commodity without specific written authorization from the department if such person operates a weighing and measuring establishment and knows or has reason to know the tag, seal, or mark has been removed;

(4) Hinder, obstruct, or refuse to assist the director in the performance of his or her duties;

(5) Maintain or have in his or her possession any commercial weighing and measuring device that has not been registered and inspected in accordance with the provisions of the Weights and Measures Act;

(6) Sell or keep for sale less than the quantity he or she represents of a commodity;

(7) Take more than the quantity he or she represents of a commodity when, as buyer, he or she furnishes the weight or measure by means of which the amount of the commodity is determined;

(8) Operate any weighing and measuring establishment without a valid permit, while the permit is suspended, or after the permit has been revoked if a permit is required by the act;

(9) Determine a gross weight and tare weight to arrive at a net weight by the use in commerce of different weighing and measuring devices that in combination will not meet the absolute value of maintenance tolerance;

(10) Falsify in any manner, by any means, or by or through a representative a recorded representation or documentation from any weighing and measuring device or any representation or delivery ticket of a commodity bought or sold by weight, measure, or count;

(11) Use any commercial weighing and measuring device in a commercial application unless a Certificate of Conformance has been issued for such device unless exempt in section 89-186.01;

(12) Sell any weighing and measuring device for use in a commercial application unless a Certificate of Conformance has been issued for such devices unless exempt in section 89-186.01;

(13) Use, add to, or modify a commercial weighing and measuring device in any way which makes the device not correct unless such change has been authorized by the director as provided for in the act;

(14) Misrepresent the price of any commodity kept for sale or sold by weight, measure, or count or represent the price in any manner calculated or tending to mislead or in any way deceive a person;

(15) Misrepresent the quantity of any commodity kept for sale or sold or represent the quantity in any manner calculated or tending to mislead or in any way deceive a person;

(16) Fail to pay all fees as prescribed by the act and the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act;

(17) Refuse to keep and make available for examination by the department all books, papers, and other information necessary for the enforcement of the act; or

(18) Use commercial weighing and measuring devices not in accordance with rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the director pursuant to subdivision (3)(d) of section 89-187.

Laws 1972, LB 1413, § 15;

Laws 1991, LB 356, § 27;

Laws 1993, LB 267, § 30;

Laws 2016, LB909, § 16.